Illinois, session 104th, HB3770.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 5Program Act is amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 130/35)7    Sec. 35. Certifying health care professional requirements. 8    (a) A certifying health care professional who certifies a 9debilitating medical condition for a qualifying patient shall 10comply with all of the following requirements: 11        (1) The certifying health care professional shall be 12    currently licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987 13    to practice medicine in all its branches, the Nurse 14    Practice Act, or the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 15    1987, shall be in good standing, and must hold a 16    controlled substances license under Article III of the 17    Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 18        (2) A certifying health care professional certifying a 19    patient's condition shall comply with generally accepted 20    standards of medical practice, the provisions of the Act 21    under which he or she is licensed and all applicable 22    rules. 23        (3) The physical examination required by this Act may   HB3770- 2 -LRB104 08637 BDA 18690 b1    not be performed by remote means, including telemedicine. 2        (4) The certifying health care professional shall 3    maintain a record-keeping system for all patients for whom 4    the certifying health care professional has certified the 5    patient's medical condition. These records shall be 6    accessible to and subject to review by the Department of 7    Public Health and the Department of Financial and 8    Professional Regulation upon request. 9    (b) A certifying health care professional may not: 10        (1) accept, solicit, or offer any form of remuneration 11    from or to a qualifying patient, primary caregiver, 12    cultivation center, or dispensing organization, including 13    each principal officer, board member, agent, and employee, 14    to certify a patient, other than accepting payment from a 15    patient for the fee associated with the required 16    examination, except for the limited purpose of performing 17    a medical cannabis-related research study;18        (1.5) accept, solicit, or offer any form of 19    remuneration from or to a medical cannabis cultivation 20    center or dispensary organization for the purposes of 21    referring a patient to a specific dispensary organization; 22        (1.10) engage in any activity that is prohibited under 23    Section 22.2 of the Medical Practice Act of 1987, 24    regardless of whether the certifying health care 25    professional is a physician, advanced practice registered 26    nurse, or physician assistant;   HB3770- 3 -LRB104 08637 BDA 18690 b1        (2) offer a discount of any other item of value to a 2    qualifying patient who uses or agrees to use a particular 3    primary caregiver or dispensing organization to obtain 4    medical cannabis; 5        (3) conduct a personal physical examination of a 6    patient for purposes of diagnosing a debilitating medical 7    condition at a location where medical cannabis is sold or 8    distributed or at the address of a principal officer, 9    agent, or employee or a medical cannabis organization; 10        (4) hold a direct or indirect economic interest in a 11    cultivation center or dispensing organization if he or she 12    recommends the use of medical cannabis to qualified 13    patients or is in a partnership or other fee or 14    profit-sharing relationship with a certifying health care 15    professional who recommends medical cannabis, except for 16    the limited purpose of performing a medical 17    cannabis-related research study; 18        (5) serve on the board of directors or as an employee 19    of a cultivation center or dispensing organization; 20        (6) refer patients to a cultivation center, a 21    dispensing organization, or a registered designated 22    caregiver; or23        (7) advertise in a cultivation center or a dispensing 24    organization. 25    (c) The Department of Public Health may with reasonable 26cause refer a certifying health care professional, who has   HB3770- 4 -LRB104 08637 BDA 18690 b1certified a debilitating medical condition of a patient, to 2the Illinois Department of Financial and Professional 3Regulation for potential violations of this Section. 4    (d) Any violation of this Section or any other provision 5of this Act or rules adopted under this Act is a violation of 6the certifying health care professional's licensure act. 7    (e) A certifying health care professional who certifies a 8debilitating medical condition for a qualifying patient may 9notify the Department of Public Health in writing: (1) if the 10certifying health care professional has reason to believe 11either that the registered qualifying patient has ceased to 12suffer from a debilitating medical condition; (2) that the 13bona fide health care professional-patient relationship has 14terminated; or (3) that continued use of medical cannabis 15would result in contraindication with the patient's other 16medication. The registered qualifying patient's registry 17identification card shall be revoked by the Department of 18Public Health after receiving the certifying health care 19professional's notification. 20    (f) Nothing in this Act shall preclude a certifying health 21care professional from referring a patient for health 22services, except when the referral is limited to certification 23purposes only, under this Act. 24(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)